Utah statutes.
10-6-147.   Quarterly financial reports -- First and second class cities.

The city auditor in cities of the first and second class shall prepare and present to the governing body appropriate quarterly financial reports, prepared in the manner prescribed in the Uniform Accounting Manual for Utah Cities.



Amended by Chapter 48, 1981 General Session

